Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202657-1609
Permit; issuance; consultation required.

Before issuing a permit, the commission shall consult with the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment and the Underground Injection Control program permitting authority.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 318.